Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
205A

COASTAL
ZONE MANAGEMENT

Part I. Coastal Zone Management

Section

205A-1 Definitions

205A-2 Coastal zone management program;
objectives and

policies

205A-3 Lead agency

205A-3.5 Public advisory body; establishment; composition

205A-4 Implementation of objectives, policies,
and

guidelines

205A-5 Compliance

205A-6 Cause of action

Part II. Special Management Areas

205A-21 Findings and purposes

205A-22 Definitions

205A-23 County special management area boundaries

205A-24, 25 Repealed

205A-26 Special management area guidelines

205A-27 Designation of special management area
authority

205A-28 Permit required for development

205A-29 Special management area use permit
procedure

205A-30 Emergency and minor permits

205A-30.5 Prohibitions

205A-31 Repealed

205A-32 Penalties

205A-33 Injunctions

Part III. Shoreline Setbacks

205A-41 Definitions

205A-42 Determination of the shoreline

205A-43 Establishment of shoreline setbacks and
duties and

powers of the department

205A-43.5 Powers and duties of the authority

205A-43.6 Enforcement of shoreline setbacks

205A-44 Prohibitions

205A-45 Shoreline setback lines established by
county

205A-46 Variances

205A-47 Repealed

205A-48 Conflict of other laws

205A-49 Adoption of rules

Part IV. Marine and Coastal Affairs

205A-61 Definitions

205A-62 Duties and responsibilities of the lead
agency

205A-63 Agency duties to coordinate related
programs

205A-64 Public participation

Part V. Other Provisions

205A-71 Artificial light on shoreline and ocean
waters

Note

Broadband services;
exemption from certain permitting requirements. L 2011, c 151; L 2013, c 264, §3;
L 2016, c 193, §§1, 2.

Department of transportation's bridge
rehabilitation and replacement program; temporary exemption from certain
construction requirements of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until
completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Kaho‘olawe island
reserve, see chapter 6K.

Climate adaptation,
see chapter 225P.

Law Journals and Reviews

Native Hawaiian
Cultural Practices Under Threat. I HBJ No. 13, at pg. 1.

Timesharing in the
1990s. I HBJ No. 13, at pg. 89.

Sandy Beach Defense
Fund v. City and County of Honolulu: The Sufficiency of Legislative Hearings
in an Administrative Setting. 12 UH L. Rev. 499.

Shoreline Setback
Regulations and the Takings Analysis. 13 UH L. Rev. 1.

The Lum
Court, Land Use, and the Environment: A Survey of Hawai`i Case Law 1983 to
1991. 14 UH L. Rev. 119.

Public Access
Shoreline Hawaii v. Hawaii County Planning Commission: The Affirmative Duty to
Consider the Effect of Development on Native Hawaiian Gathering Rights. 16 UH
L. Rev. 303.

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai‘i Constitution Article XI, Section
9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367
(2010).

The Moon Court, Land Use, and Property: A Survey of Hawai‘i Case Law 1993-2010. 33 UH L. Rev.
635 (2011).

Case Notes

Existence of chapter
does not preclude private right of action to force beach access. 65 H. 383,
652 P.2d 1130.

Chapter requires
county planning commission to give cultural interests asserted by public
interest group "full consideration" and obligates commission to "preserve
and protect" native Hawaiian rights to the extent feasible when issuing
SMA permits. 79 H. 425, 903 P.2d 1246.

No private right of
action for damages existed for commercial tour boat operators under Kauai
county's special management area rules (Hanalei Estuary Management Plan) or
under Hawaii administrative rules, chapter 256, entitled "Ocean Recreation
Management Rules and Areas", as promulgated under this chapter and chapter
200, respectively, where both rules were not promulgated with the objective of
protecting business interests or competition, but rather with the objective of
protecting and preserving the environment for the general public. 110 H. 302,
132 P.3d 1213 (2006).

As this chapter and
the Kauai county planning commission's rules did not prohibit developer from
proposing the developer's shoreline setback in developer's application for the
special management area use permit, and commission was not prohibited from
accepting the developer's setback in approving the permit, the commission's use
of the developer's setback was consistent with the plain language in the permit
order, as also reflected in plaintiff's deed; thus, commission's imposition of
developer's setback on plaintiff's land was justified. 115 H. 477, 168 P.3d
929 (2007).

Where the city
council did not delegate the power to determine the effects on archeological
resources and the means to protect the resources to a private petitioner, and
conditioned the issuance of any development permit for the rail project on its
receipt of documentation that a programmatic agreement to minimize and mitigate
adverse effects on historic properties as generally described in the final
environmental impact statement had been executed, the city and State gave full
consideration to cultural and historic values as required under this chapter.
128 H. 53, 283 P.3d 60 (2012).

Chapter does not
apply to any development, existing or planned, for which permits listed in L
1975, c 176, §3 were issued or ordinances were passed prior to December 1,
1975. 4 H. App. 304, 666 P.2d 177.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next